Utah statutes.
58-60-106.   Status of licenses held on the effective date of this chapter.

An individual holding a valid Utah license as a clinical social worker, certified social worker, social service worker, or marriage and family therapist under any licensing or practice acts in this title in effect immediately prior to July 1, 1994, is on and after July 1, 1994, considered to hold a current license under this chapter in the comparable classification as a clinical social worker, certified social worker, social service worker, or marriage and family therapist.

